New York, session 2025-2026, S9749.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 331 of the highway law, as 2 added by chapter 398 of the laws of 2011, is amended and a new subdivi- 3 sion (e) is added to read as follows: 4 (a) For all state, county and local transportation projects that are 5 undertaken by the department or receive [both] federal [and], state or 6 both federal and state funding and are subject to department of trans- 7 portation oversight, the department or agency with jurisdiction over 8 such projects shall consider the convenient access and mobility on the 9 road network by all users of all ages, including motorists, pedestrians, 10 bicyclists, and public transportation users through the use of complete 11 street design features in the planning, design, construction, recon- 12 struction and rehabilitation, but not including resurfacing, mainte- 13 nance, or pavement recycling of such projects. 14 (e) The department may compile and make available publicly, on its 15 website, design guidance and reference material related to consideration 16 of complete street design, including but not limited to the department's 17 highway design guidance, federal highway administration guidance, and 18 guidance from nationally recognized highway and transportation associ- 19 ations and organizations, to assist agencies with jurisdiction over 20 projects subject to the provisions of this section in complying with 21 this section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 23 it shall have become a law; provided, however, that this act shall not 24 apply to transportation projects undertaken or approved prior to the 25 date on which this act shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 26 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 27 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 28 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00174-01-5